Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1263YH (4) 91 jm/md H.F. 171 Section 1. Section 428A.8, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu 2 thereof the following: 3 2. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and each 4 succeeding fiscal year, of the receipts remitted to the 5 department of revenue under subsection 1, sixty-five percent 6 of the receipts shall be deposited in the general fund, thirty 7 percent of the receipts shall be transferred to the housing 8 trust fund created in section 16.181, and five percent of the 9 receipts shall be transferred to the shelter assistance fund 10 created in section 16.41. 11 Sec. 2. Section 428A.8, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 12 by striking the subsection. 13